Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1041HV (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 387 Section 1. Section 483A.24, subsection 16, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 16. Upon payment of the fee established by rules adopted 3 pursuant to section 483A.1 for a lifetime fishing license , or 4 lifetime hunting and fishing combined license, or lifetime 5 fur harvester license, the department shall issue a lifetime 6 fishing license , or lifetime hunting and fishing combined 7 license , or lifetime fur harvester license to a resident of 8 Iowa who has served in the armed forces of the United States 9 on federal active duty and who was disabled or was a prisoner 10 of war during that veteranâs military service. The department 11 shall prepare an application to be used by a person requesting 12 a lifetime fishing license , or lifetime hunting and fishing 13 combined license , or lifetime fur harvester license under this 14 subsection . The department of veterans affairs shall assist 15 the department in verifying the status or claims of applicants 16 under this subsection . As used in this subsection , âdisabledâ 17 means entitled to a service connected rating under 38 U.S.C. 18 ch. 11. 19